Vermont, session 2025-2026, H783.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. § 2466e is added to read:
§ 2466e. CHATBOT DISCLOSURE
(a) No person shall engage in a commercial transaction or trade practice
with a consumer in which the consumer is communicating or otherwise
interacting with a chatbot that may mislead or deceive a reasonable person to
believe the person is engaging with an actual human, whether or not any
consumer is in fact misled or deceived, unless the consumer is notified in a
clear and conspicuous manner that the consumer is communicating with a
chatbot and not an actual human being.
(b) As used in this section, “chatbot” means any artificial intelligence,
algorithmic, or automated system that generates information via text, audio,
image, or video in a manner that simulates interpersonal interactions or
conversation. “Chatbot” includes artificial intelligence agents, avatars, or
other computer technology that engages in textual or aural conversations.
(c) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section commits an unfair
and deceptive act in commerce in violation of section 2453 of this title.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386301 v.1